Illinois, session 104th, SB1502.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Probation and Probation Officers Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 110/15)  (from Ch. 38, par. 204-7)7    Sec. 15. (1) The Supreme Court of Illinois may establish a 8Division of Probation Services whose purpose shall be the 9development, establishment, promulgation, and enforcement of 10uniform standards for probation services in this State, and to 11otherwise carry out the intent of this Act. The Division may:12        (a) establish qualifications for chief probation 13    officers and other probation and court services personnel 14    as to hiring, promotion, and training.15        (b) make available, on a timely basis, lists of those 16    applicants whose qualifications meet the regulations 17    referred to herein, including on said lists all candidates 18    found qualified.19        (c) establish a means of verifying the conditions for 20    reimbursement under this Act and develop criteria for 21    approved costs for reimbursement.22        (d) develop standards and approve employee 23    compensation schedules for probation and court services   SB1502- 2 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    departments.2        (e) employ sufficient personnel in the Division to 3    carry out the functions of the Division.4        (f) establish a system of training and establish 5    standards for personnel orientation and training.6        (g) develop standards for a system of record keeping 7    for cases and programs, gather statistics, establish a 8    system of uniform forms, and develop research for planning 9    of Probation Services.10        (h) develop standards to assure adequate support 11    personnel, office space, equipment and supplies, travel 12    expenses, and other essential items necessary for 13    Probation and Court Services Departments to carry out 14    their duties.15        (i) review and approve annual plans submitted by 16    Probation and Court Services Departments.17        (j) monitor and evaluate all programs operated by 18    Probation and Court Services Departments, and may include 19    in the program evaluation criteria such factors as the 20    percentage of probation sentences for felons convicted of 21    probationable offenses.22        (k) seek the cooperation of local and State government 23    and private agencies to improve the quality of probation 24    and court services.25        (l) where appropriate, establish programs and 26    corresponding standards designed to generally improve the   SB1502- 3 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    quality of probation and court services and reduce the 2    rate of adult or juvenile offenders committed to the 3    Department of Corrections.4        (m) establish such other standards and regulations and 5    do all acts necessary to carry out the intent and purposes 6    of this Act.7    The Division shall develop standards to implement the 8Domestic Violence Surveillance Program established under 9Section 5-8A-7 of the Unified Code of Corrections, including 10(i) procurement of equipment and other services necessary to 11implement the program and (ii) development of uniform 12standards for the delivery of the program through county 13probation departments, and develop standards for collecting 14data to evaluate the impact and costs of the Domestic Violence 15Surveillance Program. 16    The Division shall establish a model list of structured 17intermediate sanctions that may be imposed by a probation 18agency for violations of terms and conditions of a sentence of 19probation, conditional discharge, or supervision.20    The Division shall establish training standards for 21continuing education of probation officers and supervisors and 22broaden access to available training programs. 23    The State of Illinois shall provide for the costs of 24personnel, travel, equipment, telecommunications, postage, 25commodities, printing, space, contractual services and other 26related costs necessary to carry out the intent of this Act.  SB1502- 4 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    (2)(a) The chief judge of each circuit shall provide 2full-time probation services for all counties within the 3circuit, in a manner consistent with the annual probation 4plan, the standards, policies, and regulations established by 5the Supreme Court. A probation district of two or more 6counties within a circuit may be created for the purposes of 7providing full-time probation services. Every county or group 8of counties within a circuit shall maintain a probation 9department which shall be under the authority of the Chief 10Judge of the circuit or some other judge designated by the 11Chief Judge. The Chief Judge, through the Probation and Court 12Services Department shall submit annual plans to the Division 13for probation and related services.14    (b) The Chief Judge of each circuit shall appoint the 15Chief Probation Officer and all other probation officers for 16his or her circuit from lists of qualified applicants supplied 17by the Supreme Court. Candidates for chief managing officer 18and other probation officer positions must apply with both the 19Chief Judge of the circuit and the Supreme Court.20    (3) A Probation and Court Service Department shall apply 21to the Supreme Court for funds for basic services, and may 22apply for funds for new and expanded programs or 23Individualized Services and Programs. Costs shall be 24reimbursed monthly based on a plan and budget approved by the 25Supreme Court. No Department may be reimbursed for costs which 26exceed or are not provided for in the approved annual plan and   SB1502- 5 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1budget. After the effective date of this amendatory Act of 21985, each county must provide basic services in accordance 3with the annual plan and standards created by the division. No 4department may receive funds for new or expanded programs or 5individualized services and programs unless they are in 6compliance with standards as enumerated in paragraph (h) of 7subsection (1) of this Section, the annual plan, and standards 8for basic services.9    (4) The Division shall reimburse the county or counties 10for probation services as follows:11        (a) 100% of the salary of all chief managing officers 12    designated as such by the Chief Judge and the division.13        (b) 100% of the salary for all probation officer and 14    supervisor positions approved for reimbursement by the 15    division after April 1, 1984, to meet workload standards, 16    and to implement intensive sanction and probation 17    supervision programs, pretrial services programs, 18    specialty court programs, and other basic services as 19    defined in this Act.20        (c) 100% of the salary for all secure detention 21    personnel and non-secure group home personnel approved for 22    reimbursement after December 1, 1990. For all such 23    positions approved for reimbursement before December 1, 24    1990, the counties shall be reimbursed $1,250 per month 25    beginning July 1, 1995, and an additional $250 per month 26    beginning each July 1st thereafter until the positions   SB1502- 6 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    receive 100% salary reimbursement. Allocation of such 2    positions will be based on comparative need considering 3    capacity, staff/resident ratio, physical plant and 4    program.5        (d) $1,000 per month for salaries for the remaining 6    probation officer positions engaged in basic services and 7    new or expanded services. All such positions shall be 8    approved by the division in accordance with this Act and 9    division standards. For all positions approved for 10    reimbursement under this paragraph (d), of the total 11    statewide number as of July 1, 2023, beginning on July 1, 12    2026, 20% of that number shall be transferred to paragraph 13    (b), requiring 100% salary reimbursement. Each subsequent 14    July 1, another 20% of the July 1, 2023 population shall be 15    transferred to paragraph (b) until there are no positions 16    left under this paragraph (d). 17        (e) (Blank). 100% of the travel expenses in accordance 18    with Division standards for all Probation positions 19    approved under paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of this 20    Section.21        (f) If the amount of funds reimbursed to the county 22    under paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection 4 of this 23    Section on an annual basis is less than the amount the 24    county had received during the 12 month period immediately 25    prior to the effective date of this amendatory Act of 26    1985, then the Division shall reimburse the amount of the   SB1502- 7 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    difference to the county. The effect of paragraph (b) of 2    subsection 7 of this Section shall be considered in 3    implementing this supplemental reimbursement provision.4    (5) The Division shall provide funds beginning on April 1, 51987 for the counties to provide Individualized Services and 6Programs as provided in Section 16 of this Act.7    (6) A Probation and Court Services Department in order to 8be eligible for the reimbursement must submit to the Supreme 9Court an application containing such information and in such a 10form and by such dates as the Supreme Court may require. 11Departments to be eligible for funding must satisfy the 12following conditions:13        (a) The Department shall have on file with the Supreme 14    Court an annual Probation plan for continuing, improved, 15    and new Probation and Court Services Programs approved by 16    the Supreme Court or its designee. This plan shall 17    indicate the manner in which Probation and Court Services 18    will be delivered and improved, consistent with the 19    minimum standards and regulations for Probation and Court 20    Services, as established by the Supreme Court. In counties 21    with more than one Probation and Court Services Department 22    eligible to receive funds, all Departments within that 23    county must submit plans which are approved by the Supreme 24    Court.25        (b) The annual probation plan shall seek to generally 26    improve the quality of probation services and to reduce   SB1502- 8 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    the commitment of adult offenders to the Department of 2    Corrections and to reduce the commitment of juvenile 3    offenders to the Department of Juvenile Justice and shall 4    require, when appropriate, coordination with the 5    Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile 6    Justice, and the Department of Children and Family 7    Services in the development and use of community 8    resources, information systems, case review and permanency 9    planning systems to avoid the duplication of services.10        (c) The Department shall be in compliance with 11    standards developed by the Supreme Court for basic, new 12    and expanded services, training, personnel hiring and 13    promotion.14        (d) The Department shall in its annual plan indicate 15    the manner in which it will support the rights of crime 16    victims and in which manner it will implement Article I, 17    Section 8.1 of the Illinois Constitution and in what 18    manner it will coordinate crime victims' support services 19    with other criminal justice agencies within its 20    jurisdiction, including but not limited to, the State's 21    Attorney, the Sheriff and any municipal police department.22    (7) No statement shall be verified by the Supreme Court or 23its designee or vouchered by the Comptroller unless each of 24the following conditions have been met:25        (a) The probation officer is a full-time employee 26    appointed by the Chief Judge to provide probation services   SB1502- 9 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    or a part-time employee who serves as a detention officer.2        (b) The probation officer, in order to be eligible for 3    State reimbursement, is receiving a salary of at least 4    $17,000 per year, unless serving as a part-time detention 5    officer.6        (c) The probation officer is appointed or was 7    reappointed in accordance with minimum qualifications or 8    criteria established by the Supreme Court; however, all 9    probation officers appointed prior to January 1, 1978, 10    shall be exempted from the minimum requirements 11    established by the Supreme Court. Payments shall be made 12    to counties employing these exempted probation officers as 13    long as they are employed in the position held on the 14    effective date of this amendatory Act of 1985. Promotions 15    shall be governed by minimum qualifications established by 16    the Supreme Court.17        (d) The Department has an established compensation 18    schedule approved by the Supreme Court. The compensation 19    schedule shall include salary ranges with necessary 20    increments to compensate each employee. The increments 21    shall, within the salary ranges, be based on such factors 22    as bona fide occupational qualifications, performance, and 23    length of service. Each position in the Department shall 24    be placed on the compensation schedule according to job 25    duties and responsibilities of such position. The policy 26    and procedures of the compensation schedule shall be made   SB1502- 10 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1    available to each employee.2    (8) In order to obtain full reimbursement of all approved 3costs, each Department must continue to employ at least the 4same number of probation officers and probation managers as 5were authorized for employment for the fiscal year which 6includes January 1, 1985. This number shall be designated as 7the base amount of the Department. No positions approved by 8the Division under paragraph (b) of subsection 4 will be 9included in the base amount. In the event that the Department 10employs fewer Probation officers and Probation managers than 11the base amount for a period of 90 days, funding received by 12the Department under subsection 4 of this Section may be 13reduced on a monthly basis by the amount of the current 14salaries of any positions below the base amount.15    (9) Before the 15th day of each month, the treasurer of any 16county which has a Probation and Court Services Department, or 17the treasurer of the most populous county, in the case of a 18Probation or Court Services Department funded by more than one 19county, shall submit an itemized statement of all approved 20costs incurred in the delivery of Basic Probation and Court 21Services under this Act to the Supreme Court. The treasurer 22may also submit an itemized statement of all approved costs 23incurred in the delivery of new and expanded Probation and 24Court Services as well as Individualized Services and 25Programs. The Supreme Court or its designee shall verify 26compliance with this Section and shall examine and audit the   SB1502- 11 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1monthly statement and, upon finding them to be correct, shall 2forward them to the Comptroller for payment to the county 3treasurer. In the case of payment to a treasurer of a county 4which is the most populous of counties sharing the salary and 5expenses of a Probation and Court Services Department, the 6treasurer shall divide the money between the counties in a 7manner that reflects each county's share of the cost incurred 8by the Department.9    (10) The county treasurer must certify that funds received 10under this Section shall be used solely to maintain and 11improve Probation and Court Services. The county or circuit 12shall remain in compliance with all standards, policies and 13regulations established by the Supreme Court. If at any time 14the Supreme Court determines that a county or circuit is not in 15compliance, the Supreme Court shall immediately notify the 16Chief Judge, county board chairman and the Director of Court 17Services Chief Probation Officer. If after 90 days of written 18notice the noncompliance still exists, the Supreme Court shall 19be required to reduce the amount of monthly reimbursement by 2010%. An additional 10% reduction of monthly reimbursement 21shall occur for each consecutive month of noncompliance. 22Except as provided in subsection 5 of Section 15, funding to 23counties shall commence on April 1, 1986. Funds received under 24this Act shall be used to provide for Probation Department 25expenses including those required under Section 13 of this 26Act. The Mandatory Arbitration Fund may be used to provide for   SB1502- 12 -LRB104 05791 RLC 15822 b1Probation Department expenses, including those required under 2Section 13 of this Act.3    (11) The respective counties shall be responsible for 4capital and space costs, fringe benefits, clerical costs, 5equipment, telecommunications, postage, commodities and 6printing.7    (12) For purposes of this Act only, probation officers 8shall be considered peace officers. In the exercise of their 9official duties, probation officers, sheriffs, and police 10officers may, anywhere within the State, arrest any 11probationer who is in violation of any of the conditions of his 12or her probation, conditional discharge, or supervision, and 13it shall be the duty of the officer making the arrest to take 14the probationer before the Court having jurisdiction over the 15probationer for further order.16(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.)